Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.095

Multiagency permitting team account.

The multiagency permitting team account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from cost-reimbursement agreements authorized in RCW 43.42.070 and solicitations authorized in RCW 43.42.092 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for covering staffing, consultant, technology, and other administrative costs of multiagency permitting teams and other costs associated with multiagency project review and management that may arise. Only the director of the office of regulatory assistance or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2012 c 196 s 5; 2010 c 162 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 162: See note following RCW 43.42.090.